Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 9.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-909
Conviction; court order not to own
or possess livestock animal; violation; penalty; seizure of livestock animal.

(1) If a person
is convicted of a Class IV felony under section 54-903, the sentencing court
shall order such person not to own or possess a livestock animal for at least
five years after the date of conviction, but such time restriction shall not
exceed fifteen years. Any person violating such court order shall be guilty
of a Class I misdemeanor.

(2) If a person
is convicted of a Class I misdemeanor under section 54-903 or a Class III
misdemeanor under section 54-904, the sentencing court may order such person
not to own or possess any livestock animal after the date of conviction, but
such time restriction, if any, shall not exceed five years. Any person violating
such court order shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

(3) Any livestock
animal involved in a violation of a court order under subsection (1) or (2)
of this section shall be subject to seizure by law enforcement.

Laws 2010, LB865, § 9.